Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 2. Vehicle Equipment Standards and Seat Belts.

Sec. 28.05.081.
Approval of vehicle equipment.

When the commissioner has reason to believe that vehicle equipment being sold commercially in the state does not comply with the requirements of this title or regulations adopted under this title or other statutes and regulations, the commissioner may, after giving 30 days notice to the person holding the certificate of approval for the equipment in this state, conduct a hearing upon the question of compliance of the equipment. After the hearing, the commissioner shall determine whether the equipment is in compliance. If the equipment is not in compliance with the law, the commissioner shall give notice of that fact to the person holding the certificate of approval for the equipment in this state.

If, at the end of 90 days after the notice of noncompliance given under (a) of this section, the person holding the certificate of approval for the vehicle equipment has failed to satisfy the commissioner that the equipment as sold after the 90 days is in compliance with the law, the commissioner shall suspend or revoke the approval issued for the equipment until the equipment is resubmitted to, and retested by, a testing agency approved by the commissioner and is found to be in compliance with the law. The commissioner may, at the time of retest, purchase in the open market and submit to the testing agency one or more sets of the equipment. If the equipment upon retest fails to comply with the law, the commissioner may refuse to renew the certificate of approval of the equipment.

After January 1, 1978, a motorcycle helmet may not be manufactured or sold in this state that does not conform to standards established in regulations adopted by the commissioner. These regulations must provide for helmets that allow normal peripheral vision and hearing and minimize neck injuries to the wearer potentially caused by the helmet. For the purposes of this section and AS

28.05.011(a)(2)

, a motorcycle helmet is considered to be vehicle equipment.

In this section, “commissioner” means the commissioner of public safety.

History.

(§ 6 ch 178 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 99 § 32 (1997))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1997, in subsection (c), “AS

28.05.011(a)(2)

” was substituted for “AS

28.05.011

(2)” to reflect the addition of AS

28.05.011

(b) by § 25, E.O. 99.

Cross references. —

For provisions regulating the manufacture and sale of motorcycle helmets, see AS

28.35.245(a)

.

Collateral references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d, Automobiles and Highway Traffic, § 190 et seq.

60 C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, § 43 et seq.

Sec. 28.05.090.
Citation form. [Repealed, § 6 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.05.091.
Impoundment of unlawful vehicles.

A motor vehicle that is driven on a highway or vehicular way or area, and that has been determined to be defective in equipment so as to be unsafe for driving, or on which the vehicle identification number has been removed, defaced, or otherwise altered, is an unlawful vehicle and may be impounded by a peace officer or an employee of the Department of Public Safety officially designated for that purpose. The owner or person in lawful possession of a vehicle that is driven on a highway or vehicular way or area and that is so defective in equipment as to be unsafe for driving shall pay the necessary costs of impounding and storing the vehicle. The impounding of a vehicle is in addition to any other penalty. Nothing in this section prevents the driving or moving of a defective vehicle in the manner directed by the peace officer or employee to a place for

the correction of a defect in the equipment;

dismantling or wrecking; or

storage without repair.

History.

(§ 6 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 1986; am E.O. No. 99 § 33 (1997))

Sec. 28.05.095.
Use of seat belts and child safety devices required.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a person

16 years of age or older may not occupy a motor vehicle while being driven on a highway unless restrained by a safety belt; and

may not drive a motor vehicle on a highway unless restrained by a safety belt.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a driver may not transport a child under the age of 16 in a motor vehicle unless the driver has provided the required safety device and properly secured each child as described in this subsection. A child

less than one year of age or a child one year of age or older who weighs less than 20 pounds shall be properly secured in a rear-facing child safety seat that meets or exceeds standards of the United States Department of Transportation and is used in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions;

one or more years of age but less than four years of age who weighs 20 pounds or more shall be properly secured in a child restraint device that meets or exceeds the standards of the United States Department of Transportation and is used in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions;

over four years of age but less than eight years of age who is less than 57 inches in height and weighs 20 or more pounds but less than 65 pounds shall be properly secured in a booster seat that is secured by a seat belt system or by another child passenger restraint system that meets or exceeds the standards of the United States Department of Transportation and is used in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions;

over four years of age who exceeds the height or weight requirements in (3) of this subsection shall be properly secured in a seat belt;

eight years of age but less than 16 years of age who does not exceed the height and weight requirements in (3) of this subsection shall be properly secured in a child safety device approved for a child of that size by the United States Department of Transportation or in a safety belt, whichever is appropriate for the particular child as determined solely by the driver.

Subsections (a) and (b) of this section do not apply to

passengers in a school bus, unless the school bus is required to be equipped with seat belts by the United States Department of Transportation, or an emergency vehicle;

a vehicle operator acting in the course of employment delivering mail or newspapers from inside the vehicle to roadside mail or newspaper boxes;

a person or class of persons exempted by regulation under AS

28.05.096

;

a person required to be restrained by safety belts under (a) or (b) of this section if the motor vehicle is not equipped with safety belts; or

operators or passengers of motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, off-highway vehicles, electric personal mobility vehicles, snowmobiles, and similar vehicles not designed to be operated on a highway.

A person may not remove a safety belt from a vehicle solely to be exempted under (c)(4) of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a peace officer may not stop or detain a motor vehicle to determine compliance with (a) of this section, or issue a citation for a violation of (a) of this section, unless the peace officer has probable cause to stop or detain the motor vehicle.

In a prosecution under (a) of this section, the prosecution must prove that the peace officer stopping or detaining the vehicle personally observed the violation of (a) of this section before stopping or detaining the vehicle or otherwise had probable cause to stop or detain the vehicle.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 98 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 35 ch 35 SLA 2003; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 2 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 2009; am § 2 ch 31 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective September 15, 2009, rewrote (b), which read, “Except as provided in (c) of this section, a driver may not transport a child under the age of 16 in a motor vehicle unless the driver has provided the required safety device and properly secured each child as described in this subsection. If the child is less than four years of age, the child shall be properly secured in a child safety device meeting the standards of the United States Department of Transportation for a child safety device for infants, if the child is four but not yet 16 years of age, the child shall be properly secured in a child safety device approved for a child of that age and size by the United States Department of Transportation or in a safety belt, whichever is appropriate for the particular child.”

The 2016 amendment, effective September 29, 2016, in (b)(2), substituted “four years of age” for “five years of age”.

Sec. 28.05.096.
Exemptions and alternative safety devices.

The commissioner of public safety may adopt regulations to exempt a person or a class of persons from the requirements of AS

28.05.095

if the commissioner determines that the use of a safety belt or child safety device is impractical because of physical or medical conditions of the person or class of persons.

The commissioner of public safety shall specify alternative means of protection for children exempted under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 98 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 99 § 34 (1997))

Administrative Code. —

For brakes and other equipment, see 13 AAC 4, art. 4.

Sec. 28.05.097.
Child safety device loan program. [Repealed, E.O. No. 101, § 5 (2000). For current law, see AS 19.05.043.]

Sec. 28.05.098.
Sale of child safety devices.

A person may not sell, offer for sale, or install in any motor vehicle a child safety device that does not conform to all applicable federal standards for the device on the date of the sale, offering, or installation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1984)

Sec. 28.05.099.
Penalty.

A person convicted of a violation of AS

28.05.095(a)

or (d) is guilty of an infraction and may be fined up to $15 or the court may waive the fine if the person convicted donates $15 to the emergency medical services entity providing services in the area in which the violation occurred.

A person convicted of a violation of AS

28.05.095

(b) is guilty of an infraction, and may be fined up to $50. The person may also be assessed demerit points as determined by regulations of the department, notwithstanding the provisions of AS

28.15.231(b)

. A person who violates AS

28.05.095

(b) by failing to provide a child safety device or safety belt may provide a peace officer, including a village safety officer, proof of purchase or acquisition, and installation, of an approved child safety device or safety belt. If the proof is provided within 30 days after the issuance of a citation for the infraction, the court shall dismiss the citation and no points shall be assessed under this subsection unless the person has

been convicted previously for violating AS 28.05.095 by failing to provide a child safety device or safety belt;

been cited for failure to provide a child safety device or safety belt and has forfeited the bail required by the citation; or

provided proof under this subsection on a prior occasion.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 98 SLA 1990)

Sec. 28.05.104.
School buses. [Repealed, § 2 ch 51 SLA 1999.]

Sec. 28.05.106.
Custom collector vehicle equipment.

A custom collector vehicle shall be equipped with

hydraulic service brakes on all wheels;

sealed beam or halogen headlights;

safety belts for all occupants;

turn signals and turn signaling switch;

safety glass or lexan;

electric or vacuum windshield wiper located in front of the driver;

standard or blue-dot taillights; and

a parking brake that operates on at least two wheels on the same axle.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title or regulations adopted under this title, the Department of Public Safety may not require a custom collector vehicle to be equipped with a bumper, hood, or fenders.

A custom collector vehicle shall be equipped in a manner that while in motion and functional on the vehicle’s four rims on a flat surface, the suspension, steering, or chassis does not contact the highway, vehicular way, or area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 8 SLA 1993; am E.O. No. 99 § 36 (1997))